Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.545

Alternative jet fuels—Emissions of ultrafine and fine particulate matter.

(1) To assess the potential cobenefits of alternative jet fuel for Washington's communities, by December 1, 2024, and December 1st of each year until such time as the joint legislative audit and review committee has completed its final report on the tax preferences contained in RCW 82.04.287, 82.04.436, 82.04.4361, and 82.16.187, the University of Washington's department of environmental and occupational health sciences, in collaboration with Washington State University, shall calculate emissions of ultrafine and fine particulate matter and sulfur oxides from the use of alternative jet fuel as compared to conventional fossil jet fuel, including the potential regional air quality benefits of any reductions. This emissions calculation shall be conducted for alternative jet fuel used from an international airport owned by a port district in a county with a population greater than 1,500,000. The University of Washington may access and use any data necessary to complete the reporting requirements of this section.

(2) To facilitate the calculation required in subsection (1) of this section, an international airport owned by a port district in a county with a population greater than 1,500,000 must report to the University of Washington the total annual volume of conventional and alternative jet fuel used for flights departing the airport by July 1, 2024, and July 1st of each year until such time as the joint legislative audit and review committee has completed its final report on the tax preferences contained in RCW 82.04.287, 82.04.436, 82.04.4361, and 82.16.187.

[ 2023 c 232 s 7.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 2023 c 232 s 7 directed that this section be added to chapter 28B.30 RCW, but codification in chapter 28B.20 RCW appears to be more appropriate.

Effective date—2023 c 232 ss 1-7: See note following RCW 70A.535.010.

Automatic expiration date exemption—2023 c 232: See note following RCW 82.04.287.

Intent—2023 c 232: See note following RCW 70A.535.010.